Mississippi statutes. Title 85. Debtor-Creditor Relationship
Article 13. Laundry Plant Operators.

§ 85-7-221.
Definition.

As used in Sections 85-7-221 through 85-7-233, the term “person” shall mean a natural person, partnership, corporation, or other legal entity.

HISTORY:
Codes 1942, § 382-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 468, §§ 1-8; Laws, 1962, ch. 489, eff 30 days from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 85-7-223.
Sale of clothing, etc., for cleaning charges.

Any garment, clothing, wearing apparel or household goods, which have been repaired, altered, dyed, cleaned, pressed, glazed or laundered, remaining in the possession of a person for a period of ninety (90) days or more, may be sold to pay reasonable or agreed charges, together with any costs or expenses provided for in Sections 85-7-221 through 85-7-233. Except as otherwise provided in Section 85-7-235, the person to whom such charges are payable and owing shall first notify the owner or owners of the proposed sale of the articles belonging to them and the amount of the charges due thereon in the manner prescribed in Section 85-7-227.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 382-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 468 §§ 1-8; Laws, 1962, ch. 489; Laws, 1992, ch. 315, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 85-7-225.
Sale of clothing, etc., for storage charges permitted.

All garments, clothing, wearing apparel, or household goods placed in storage, or on which any of the services or labors mentioned in Section 85-7-223 have been performed and then placed in storage, by agreement and remaining in the possession of a person without the reasonable or agreed charges having been paid for a period of ninety (90) days, may be sold to pay said charges, provided that the person has notified the owner or owners thereof of the sale as prescribed in Section 85-7-227. Persons operating as warehouses or warehousemen shall not be affected by this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942 § 382-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 468, §§ 1-8; Laws, 1962, ch. 489; Laws, 1992, ch. 315, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 85-7-227.
Notice to owners.

The mailing by United States certified mail, return receipt requested, of a letter with a return address marked thereon, addressed to the owner or owners, at their last known address or the address given at the time of delivery of such articles to the person, shall constitute notice under the provisions of Sections 85-7-221 through 85-7-233. The letter shall state that the articles upon which the charges are owing will be disposed of unless they are redeemed within thirty (30) days of the mailing of the notice. Said notice shall be mailed at least thirty (30) days before the articles belonging to such owner or owners may be sold for charges due thereon. The cost of mailing said letter shall be added to the charges.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 382-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 468, §§ 1-8; Laws, 1962, ch. 489; Laws, 1992, ch. 315, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 85-7-229.
Sale; disposition of proceeds.

If the chattel or chattels are not redeemed within thirty (30) days after the mailing of such letter, the person may sell such articles on the day and at the time and place specified in such letter. Such sales may be made either at public auction or by private sale. The proceeds of the sale in excess of the charges and necessary expenses of the procedure required by Sections 85-7-221 through 85-7-233, shall be held by the person for a period of six (6) months, and if not reclaimed by the owner thereof within that time shall escheat to the county and be paid over to the chancery clerk to be covered into the general fund of the county in which the sale was held.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 382-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 468, §§ 1-8; Laws, 1962, ch. 489, eff 30 days from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 85-7-231.
Notices required to be posted; form and content of notices.

All persons, taking advantage of Sections 85-7-221 through 85-7-233, must keep posted at all times in a prominent place in their receiving office or offices, two (2) notices of dimensions of not less than eight and one-half (8-1/2) by eleven (11) inches which read as follows: “Not responsible for goods left on hand for more than ninety (90) days. All articles cleaned, pressed, glazed, laundered, washed, altered, dyed or repaired, and not called for in ninety (90) days, will be sold to pay charges,” and “All articles which are stored by agreement and upon which the charges are not paid for ninety (90) days will be sold to pay charges.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 382-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 468, §§ 1-8; Laws, 1962, ch. 489; Laws, 1992, ch. 315, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 85-7-233.
Purposes and intent of Sections 85-7-221 through 85-7-233.

The purpose and intent of Sections 85-7-221 through 85-7-233 is to provide an inexpensive means of enforcing liens for small amounts, and to that end the provisions of said sections shall be construed to create a lien in addition to, and shall not exclude, any liens which may exist by virtue of either the common law or any other statute of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 382-01; Laws, 1946, ch. 468, §§ 1-8; Laws, 1962, ch. 489, eff 30 days from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).

§ 85-7-235.
Sale of clothing after 180 days without notice or liability to owner.

If any person fails to claim any garment, clothing, wearing apparel, household goods or other article delivered to any laundry or dry cleaning establishment described in Sections 85-7-223 and 85-7-225 and displaying the notice described in Section 85-7-231, for a period of one hundred eighty (180) days, the laundry or dry cleaning establishment, without giving notice to the owner, may dispose of such garment, clothing, wearing apparel, household goods, or other article by whatever means it may choose, without liability or responsibility to the owner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 315, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1992.